Utah statutes.
19-2-120.   Information required of owners or operators of air contaminant
sources.
The owner or operator of any stationary air contaminant source in the state
shall furnish to the board the reports required under Section 19-2-104 and any
other information the board  finds necessary to determine whether the source
is in compliance with state and federal regulations and standards.  The
information shall be correlated with applicable emission standards or
limitations and shall be available to the public during normal business hours
at the office of the department.
